Massachusetts, session 194th, H1367.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
The executive office of health and human services shall coordinate an interagency
working group to analyze the feasibility of, and a strategy for, claiming Title XIX federal
financial participation (FFP) for MassHealth covered services provided to MassHealth members
of any age attending programs at Massachusetts state colleges and universities, including
students with intellectual disabilities, developmental disabilities, and autism spectrum disorders.
The study should consider both potential programmatic and administrative federal claiming, as
well as students under and over the age of twenty-two, and Medicaid/Medicare dual eligibles.
The working group shall publish a report by April 1, 2025, and submit a copy of the report to the
joint committee on health care financing and the joint committee on higher education that
includes financial estimates of the potential additional revenue that may be collected, challenges
and opportunities, and a high-level workplan for pursuing such additional revenues.
of 1